Nebraska, session 109, LB618.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB618 LB618
2025 2025
1 Section 1. The following claim against the state, filed with and
2 recommended for disallowance by the State Claims Board and appealed by
3 the claimant, is hereby disapproved.
4 $XX.00 for Claim Number XXXX-XXXX, against the Department of XX,
5 made by XX.
-2-